Utah statutes.
75-3-718.   Compensation of personal representative and attorney.
(1)  A personal representative and an attorney are entitled to reasonable
compensation for their services.  If a petition is filed which either directly
or indirectly seeks approval of the personal representative's compensation or
the attorney's compensation and if no objection is filed by an interested
person to the compensation requested, reasonable compensation shall be the
compensation sought in the petition. When an interested person objects to the
personal representative's compensation, the court shall determine reasonable
compensation for the personal representative based on the quality, quantity,
and value of the services rendered to the estate and the circumstances under
which those services were rendered, including the practice for other
fiduciaries who are in similar circumstances to the personal representative in
question. When an interested person objects to the attorney's compensation,
the court shall determine reasonable compensation for the attorney based on
rules adopted by the Judicial Council.
(2)  When a petition seeks approval of or objects to a personal
representative's compensation or an attorney's compensation, at least ten days
before the time set for the hearing of the petition, the petitioner or the
petitioner's attorney shall send a copy of the petition to all interested
persons either by certified, registered, or first class mail or by hand-
delivery.
(3)  If a will provides for compensation of the personal representative and
there is no contract with the decedent regarding compensation,  the personal
representative may renounce the provision before qualifying and be entitled to
reasonable compensation.  A personal representative also may renounce his
right to all or any part of the compensation.  A written renunciation of fee
may be filed with the court.
